Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.005

Finding.

The legislature finds that the practices of unlawful subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in motor vehicles have a substantial negative impact on the state's financial institutions and other businesses engaged in the financing and leasing of motor vehicles.

[ 1990 c 44 s 1.]